Tennessee statutes. Title 69 Waters, Waterways, Drains And Levees
Part 3

Commissioners; Apportionment of Assessments

69-5-301. Commissioners — Appointment — Qualifications.

When the district, or other improvement provided for, has been located and established as provided for in part 1 of this chapter, the county court shall appoint three (3) or five (5) commissioners as may be determined by the county court, one (1) of whom shall be a competent civil engineer, and two (2) of whom shall be freeholders of the county, not living within the levee or drainage district, and not interested in the district, or in a like question, nor related to any party whose land is affected thereby.

Acts 1909, ch. 185, § 11; Shan., § 3871a52; Code 1932, § 4280; Acts 1971, ch. 401, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 70-901; T.C.A. §69-6-301.

Compiler's Notes. The county court structure referred to in this chapter was abolished by the 1978 amendments to Tenn. Const. arts. VI and VII. Legislative functions formerly exercised by county courts now belong to county legislative bodies. Judicial functions now belong to general sessions, chancery, or circuit courts. See also §69-5-102.

Law Reviews.

Procedure and Evidence — 1961 Tennessee Survey (II) (Edmund M. Morgan, Joel F. Handler), 15 Vand. L. Rev. 921.

69-5-302. Oath — Classification of tracts.

The commissioners shall, as soon as practicable after their appointment, and after being duly sworn to perform their duty faithfully and impartially to the best of their ability, inspect and classify all the lands benefited by the location and construction of such drainage or levee district in a graduated scale of benefits, naming the tract or tracts of each owner and so classifying the same, each tract to be numbered according to the benefit received, as provided in §69-5-305, by the proposed improvement.

Acts 1909, ch. 185, § 11; Shan., § 3871a53; Code 1932, § 4281; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 70-902; T.C.A. §69-6-302.

69-5-303. Compensation of viewers, commissioners, and helpers.

The viewers and commissioners provided for by parts 1-3 of this chapter shall be paid at the rate of three dollars ($3.00) per day while engaged in the work, and, in addition, all actual expenses, including board paid for, for which itemized accounts shall be reported and sworn to. Other necessary help aiding the engineers, viewers, or commissioners, such as chain carriers, axmen, shall be paid not more than two dollars ($2.00) per day.

Acts 1909, ch. 185, § 36; Shan., § 3871a138; Code 1932, § 4373; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 70-903; T.C.A. §69-6-303.

69-5-304. Apportionment of costs — Report.

The commissioners shall make an equitable apportionment and assessment of the costs, expenses, cost of construction, fees, and damages assessed for the construction of any such improvement, and make a report in writing of the apportionment and assessment to the county court.

Acts 1909, ch. 185, § 11; Shan., § 3871a54; Code 1932, § 4282; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 70-904; T.C.A. §69-6-304.

Compiler's Notes. The county court structure referred to in this chapter was abolished by the 1978 amendments to Tenn. Const. arts. VI and VII. Legislative functions formerly exercised by county courts now belong to county legislative bodies. Judicial functions now belong to general sessions, chancery, or circuit courts. See also §69-5-102.

69-5-305. Scale and classification as basis of assessment.

In making the apportionment and assessment provided for in §69-5-304, the lands receiving the greatest benefit shall be marked on scale of one hundred (100), and those benefited in a lesser degree shall be marked with such percentage of one hundred (100) as the benefit received bears in proportion to the scale of one hundred (100). This classification, when finally established, shall remain as a basis for all future assessments connected with the objects of the drainage or levee district, unless the county court, for good cause, shall authorize a revision of the classification.

Acts 1909, ch. 185, § 11; Shan., § 3871a55; Code 1932, § 4283; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 70-905; T.C.A. §69-6-305.

Compiler's Notes. The county court structure referred to in this chapter was abolished by the 1978 amendments to Tenn. Const. arts. VI and VII. Legislative functions formerly exercised by county courts now belong to county legislative bodies. Judicial functions now belong to general sessions, chancery, or circuit courts. See also §69-5-102.

69-5-306. Division into tracts and classification of subdivisions.

In making the classification provided for in §69-5-305, the commissioners are authorized to divide the land of one (1) owner lying in one (1) body into more than one (1) tract, and classify each subdivision of the tract, if they are of opinion that portions of the entire tract will be more benefited than other portions, and especially when the entire tract is a large one, and that it will be more equitable and just to so classify it in subdivisions.

Acts 1909, ch. 185, § 11; Shan., § 3871a56; Code 1932, § 4284; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 70-906; T.C.A. §69-6-306.

69-5-307. Description of land — Objection to assessment and apportionment — Notice.

The commissioners shall specify in their report each tract of land by reasonable description and the ownership of the tract as it appears on the tax books of the county or as it has been previously adjudged in the proceeding. Any objection to such assessment and apportionment shall be filed in writing with the county clerk on or before twelve o'clock (12:00) noon of the day the matter of the assessment and apportionment is set for hearing by the court. The assessment may be made without notice, as taxes are assessed without notice in such cases; but publication shall be made in three (3) weekly newspapers published in the county where the proceeding is pending, if there are that number published in the county, otherwise in at least one (1) weekly newspaper, for two (2) consecutive weeks, notifying all parties, concerned in any way, of the date set for hearing the matter of assessment and apportionment by the court, when they may appear and be heard, if they desire. The last of the publications shall be at least five (5) days before the day set for the hearing, and the publication shall be in lieu and stead of notice personally served, but shall not give the names of the parties, but only a brief statement of the date and purpose of such hearing.

Acts 1909, ch. 185, § 11; 1913 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 25, § 5; Shan., § 3871a57; mod. Code 1932, § 4285; Acts 1957, ch. 329, § 1; 1961, ch. 217, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 22, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 70-907; T.C.A. §69-6-307.

69-5-308. Publication.

If such district lies in more than one (1) county, publication need only be made in one (1) weekly newspaper published in each of the counties having land embraced within the district. If there are daily newspapers published in any county, but no weekly newspaper, it shall be sufficient, if such publication is made in a daily paper of such county, one (1) day in each week for the length of time required instead of in a weekly newspaper.

Acts 1915, ch. 63, § 8; Shan., § 3871a58; Code 1932, § 4286; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 70-908; T.C.A. §69-6-308.

69-5-309. Objections to apportionment and assessments — Hearings.

When the day set for hearing has arrived, and the hearing is not continued by the court for good reason, as it may be, the county court shall proceed to hear and determine all objections made and filed to the report, and may increase, diminish, annul, or affirm the apportionment and assessments made in such report, or any parts of the report, as may appear to the court to be just and equitable; but in no case shall it be competent to show that the lands assessed would not be benefited by the improvement. The county court shall assess such apportionment so fixed by it upon the lands within such levee or drainage district.

Acts 1909, ch. 185, § 11; Shan., § 3871a59; Code 1932, § 4287; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 70-909; T.C.A. §69-6-309.

Compiler's Notes. The county court structure referred to in this chapter was abolished by the 1978 amendments to Tenn. Const. arts. VI and VII. Legislative functions formerly exercised by county courts now belong to county legislative bodies. Judicial functions now belong to general sessions, chancery, or circuit courts. See also §69-5-102.

69-5-310. Additional assessments.

If the first assessment made by the court for the original cost of any improvement as provided is insufficient, the court may make an additional assessment in the same ratio as the first.

Acts 1909, ch. 185, § 11; Shan., § 3871a60; Code 1932, § 4288; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 70-910; T.C.A. §69-6-310.

69-5-311. New report may be ordered and new commissioners appointed.

If, for any reason, the court annuls in toto or sets aside such report of the commissioners, it shall order them to make a new report, or shall remove them and appoint new commissioners to act as in the first instance, if desired by the parties concerned.

Acts 1909, ch. 185, § 11; Shan., § 3871a61; Code 1932, § 4289; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 70-911; T.C.A. §69-6-311.

69-5-312. Levy upon lands of benefited owners — Ratio — Funds kept separate — Disbursement.

The assessments shall be levied upon the lands of the owners so benefited in the ratio mentioned in §69-5-305, and shall be collected in the same manner as taxes for county purposes, except as specially provided in this chapter, and the funds so collected shall be kept as a separate fund, and shall be paid out only for purposes properly connected with such improvement, and on the order or warrant of the county mayor.

Acts 1909, ch. 185, § 12; Shan., § 3871a62; Code 1932, § 4290; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 16, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 70-912; Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2; T.C.A. §69-6-312.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

69-5-313. Railroads and highways.

Whenever any railroad or public highway will be beneficially affected by the construction of any improvement or improvements in such district, it shall be the duty of the commissioners appointed to classify and assess benefits to determine and return in their report the amount of the benefit to such railroad or highway, and notice shall be served as to such railroad upon its nearest station agent, as provided in case of an individual property owner; and as to a highway, notice shall be served upon the county mayor, as in case of an individual property owner. When such special assessments have been approved and fixed by the county court as to such railroad, it shall be a debt due personally from the railroad company, and, unless the same is paid by the railroad company as special assessment, it may be collected in the name of the county in any court having jurisdiction; and as to a highway, such assessment shall be paid by the county out of the general county fund or highway tax fund, such assessments to be paid into the fund of such district.

Acts 1909, ch. 185, § 21; Shan., § 3871a93; Code 1932, § 4321; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 16, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 70-913; Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2; T.C.A. §69-6-313.

Compiler's Notes. The county court structure referred to in this chapter was abolished by the 1978 amendments to Tenn. Const. arts. VI and VII. Legislative functions formerly exercised by county courts now belong to county legislative bodies. Judicial functions now belong to general sessions, chancery, or circuit courts. See also §69-5-102.

Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

69-5-314. Claims commission to compensate districts for benefits accruing to highways.

Whenever any levee or drainage district is or has been organized under appropriate statutes of this state providing for the levee or drainage district, which levee or drainage district embraces within its boundaries any highway or highways that are a part of the state highway system, and if it is contended that such levee or drainage district, when completed, will contribute materially to the protection of such state highways from floods and other similar elements, such levee or drainage district may file its petition before the claims commission setting forth the fact that such state highways have been benefited thereby, the amount of the benefits claimed and praying for compensation for such benefits.

Upon the filing of the petition, the claims commission shall hold a hearing on the petition, at which evidence may be introduced with reference to the benefits or lack of benefits to the highway by the creation and completion of the district.

If the claims commission is of the opinion, after the hearing, that the creation and completion of the district will result or has resulted in material benefit and protection to the highway or highways, then and in that event the claims commission is expressly authorized and empowered to direct payment from the general highway funds toward the creation of the district, such amount as it may find to fairly represent the benefits accruing to the highways and occasioned by the creation and completion of the district; provided, that the actual payment of the sums found to fairly represent such benefits may, at its option, be postponed by the claims commission until there has been a substantial completion of such district; and provided further, that this section does not apply to levee or drainage districts organized more than five (5) years prior to February 13, 1941.

Acts 1941, ch. 53, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, §§ 1034.11, 4232.1 (Williams, § 4406a); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 70-914; T.C.A. §69-6-314.

Cross-References. Claims against the state, title 9, ch. 8.